California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(9) The California Film Commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, on an annual basis beginning June 30, 2027, containing diversity data provided by the applicants. The report shall contain, in the aggregate and per project, an assessment of whether the diversity workplan goals required by this section were met for qualified motion pictures that submitted the final assessment to the California Film Commission in the prior fiscal year. The assessment shall contain an account of diversity workplans submitted, interim assessments submitted, and final assessments submitted, as well as which categories of the diversity workplan checklist established pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) were
 included. In the event that a report is required pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (g) of Section 17053.98 and Section 23698 in the same year as a report is required under this paragraph, the reports may be combined into one report. The California Film Commission shall submit each such assessment to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(10) (A) The California Film Commission shall expand the number of nonprofit organizations that partner with the Career Pathways program to build upon their ongoing efforts to provide access to the widest cross section of Californians, including historically disadvantaged and underrepresented individuals seeking training and employment opportunities in motion picture and television production.

(B) (i) The California Film Commission shall establish an application process for career-based nonprofit
 organizations to obtain approval as a Career Pathways Program.

(ii) The application shall be submitted to the California Film Commission’s fiscal agent during a request for proposal process initiated by the fiscal agent.

(iii) The first request for proposal process shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent prior to the first allocation of credits allowed under this section.

(iv) The second request for proposal process shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent as needed in response to changes in program revenue or training partners, but no later than July 1, 2027.

(v) Subsequent request for proposal processes shall be initiated by the California Film Commission or its fiscal agent as the
 commission deems necessary.

(C) The California Film Commission shall approve Career Pathways programs. Career Pathways programs shall meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Be conducted by a nonprofit organization that has an established record of training and job placement in the entertainment industry.

(ii) Be focused on training individuals 18 years or older from traditionally underserved communities.

(iii) Offer training courses focused on one or more of the following:

(I) Skilled, technical positions that would be eligible for qualified wages if performed on a qualified motion picture.

(II) Administrative- and
 industry-related technical occupations.

(III) Soft skills training for the motion picture industry.

(iv) Meet minimum qualifications and standards for high-quality, skill-based training programs, as determined by the California Film Commission through regulations and in consultation with stakeholders.

(D) To ensure the Career Pathways Program is successful and has a meaningful impact, the California Film Commission and its fiscal agent shall, in addition to the requirements specified in subparagraph (C), consider the following aspects when evaluating applications:

(i) Availability of participants.

(ii) Fiscal agent administrative resources.

(iii) Overlap with the focus areas of currently approved organizations, including, but not limited to, industry role focus and student outreach focus.

(iv) Specific industry labor needs, as determined by the fiscal agent and based on information provided by industry and labor stakeholders.

(E) Before July 1, 2026, the California Film Commission shall develop criteria to incentivize supplemental placement of 1 to 4 trainees from the Career Pathways Program per qualified production. The placement of the trainees shall not displace otherwise anticipated or necessary hiring of experienced employees. Trainee wages shall be excluded from a production’s qualified wages for purposes of the jobs ratio and incentive calculation.

(11) Beginning January 1, 2025, the
 California Film Commission shall collect information to the extent available and based on data provided by the Career Pathways Training program, about the breakdown of spending by the Career Pathways Program, how participation in the Career Pathways Program by both program partners and participants has changed in comparison to prior years, whether graduates of the program are accessing jobs in the film industry upon completion of the program, what projects the students have worked on, whether those projects received a tax credit, whether students are employed in California or another state, and the aggregated self-reported and voluntarily provided ethnic, racial, gender, disability status, veteran status, and ZIP Code of those individuals. The California Film Commission shall report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and publish on its internet website an annual report about the Career Pathways Training program, with the above information. Such information shall be
 reported for participants for five years following a participant’s completion of the Career Pathways Training program, to the extent the information is available. This paragraph shall be applicable consistent with federal and state law.

(h) (1) The California Film Commission shall annually provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Franchise Tax Board, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission. The list shall include the names and taxpayer identification numbers, including taxpayer identification numbers of each partner or shareholder, as applicable, of the qualified taxpayer.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall annually post on
 its internet website and make available for public release all of the following:

(i) A table which includes all of the following information: a list of qualified taxpayers and the tax credit amounts allocated to each qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission, the number of production days in California the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would occur, the number of California jobs that the qualified taxpayer represented in its application would be directly created by the production, and the total amount of qualified expenditures expected to be spent by the production.

(ii) A narrative staff summary describing the production of the qualified taxpayer as well as background information regarding the qualified taxpayer contained in the qualified taxpayer’s application for the credit.

(iii) The
 diversity report submitted annually to the Legislature described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) organized per production and an aggregate compilation describing the voluntary programs collected pursuant to clause (xiii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the information submitted by an applicant for a tax credit under this section a public record, including for the purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) The California Film Commission shall provide each city and county in California with an instructional guide that includes, but is not limited to, a review of best practices for facilitating motion picture production in local jurisdictions, resources on hosting and encouraging motion picture production,
 and the California Film Commission’s Model Filming Ordinance. The California Film Commission shall maintain on its internet website a list of initiatives by locality that encourage motion picture production in regions across the state. The list shall be distributed to each approved applicant for the program to highlight local jurisdictions that offer incentives to facilitate film production.

(i) (1) (A) The aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated for a fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 23698.1, except as provided in subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 and subdivision (k) of Section 23698, is seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000), plus any amount described in subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) in credits for the 2025–26 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, through and including the 2029–30 fiscal year, except as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision
 (g).

(B) (i) Subject to clauses (ii) and (iii), the unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year.

(ii) The amount of unused credit allocation attributable to independent films shall only be allocated according to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(iii) The total amount of any unused credit allocation amount that is remaining shall only be allocated pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(C) The amount of previously allocated credits not certified.

(D) The amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(E) That
 portion of any unused allocation credit amount, if any, attributable to Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, or 23698 available for that fiscal year in a manner as determined by regulations promulgated by the California Film Commission.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to paragraph (4) of this subdivision and changes in allocations pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), the California Film Commission shall allocate the credit amounts subject to the following categories, but shall have discretion to reallocate up to 30 percent of the funds within any category amongst the remaining categories to maximize the amount of total credits allocated:

(i) Independent films with qualified expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less shall be allocated 5 percent of the amount specified
 in paragraph (1). Independent films with qualified expenditures in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated 5 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1). These amounts shall be in addition to any unused allocation credit amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(ii) Features and animated films shall be allocated 35 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iii) A relocating television series shall be allocated 15 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(iv) A television series described in clause (ii), (v), (vi), or (viii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (19) of subdivision (b) and recurring television series shall be allocated 40 percent of the amount specified in paragraph (1), plus any unused allocation credit
 amount, if any, for the preceding fiscal year as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) Within any allocation period for credits to a relocating television series, any unused amount shall be reallocated to the category described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) and, if any unused amount remains, reallocated in the next allocation period for credits to a relocating television series.

(C) With respect to a relocating television series issued a credit in a subsequent year pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), that subsequent credit amount shall be allowed from the allocation amount described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Any act that reduces the amount that may be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) constitutes a change in state taxes for the purpose of
 increasing revenues within the meaning of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and may be passed by not less than two-thirds of all Members elected to each of the two houses of the Legislature.

(4) A qualified motion picture, as defined in subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698, shall not be eligible for an allocation under subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, if it receives a credit under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 during that fiscal year.

(j) The California Film Commission shall have the authority to allocate tax credits in accordance with this section and in accordance with any regulations prescribed pursuant to subdivision (e) upon adoption.

(k) (1) A qualified taxpayer may make a one-time election to be paid a
 refund for each taxable year of the refundable period, not to exceed the annual refundable amount.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Annual refundable amount” means 50 percent, rounded to the nearest cent, of the total refundable amount.

(B) (i) “Credit amount” means the credit amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(ii) In the case of a pass-thru entity, the “credit amount” described in paragraphs (2) and (3) means the pro rata share or distributive share of the credit passed through to the partner or shareholder of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subclause, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership, “S” corporation, or limited liability company treated as a partnership.

(iii) In the case of an assigned credit, the “credit amount” means the credit amount that was assigned to the taxpayer.

(C) “Refundable period” means the first taxable year that the credit certificate is issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g), and the succeeding taxable year.

(D) “Total refundable amount” means 95 percent of the credit amount that exceeds the “net tax” in the first taxable year of the refundable period.

(3) The refund shall be computed as follows:

(A) (i) In the first taxable year of the refundable period, the credit amount shall be allowed against the “net tax” computed under this part for the taxable year.

(ii) If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax” in the first taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable amount shall be refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(B) (i) In the taxable year after the first taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable amount shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” computed under this part for the taxable year, and the excess, if any, shall be refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(ii) If the qualified taxpayer’s tax liability for the taxable year exceeds the annual refundable amount, only the annual refundable amount shall be allowed as a credit against the qualified taxpayer’s “net tax.”

(4) (A) In the first taxable year of the refundable period, the total refundable amount, less the annual refundable amount, shall be carried over to the succeeding taxable year.

(B) In each taxable year other than the first taxable year of the refundable period, the total refundable amount, less the annual refundable amount allowed as a credit against the qualified taxpayer’s “net tax” or refunded in the current and prior taxable years in the refundable period, shall be carried over to the next succeeding year of the refundable period.

(C) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), if an election is made pursuant to this subdivision, no amount of credit shall be allowed after the refundable period.

(5) Any refund pursuant to this subdivision shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer upon their election.

(6) An election made pursuant to this subdivision shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year that the credit certificate is issued in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(7) A taxpayer that purchases a credit pursuant to subdivision (c) cannot elect to be paid a refund pursuant to this subdivision.

(l) For the purposes of complying with Section 41 with respect to this section and Section 23698.1 the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The specific goals, purposes, and objectives that the credits allowed by this section and Section 23698.1 will achieve include all of the following:

(A) To maintain and expand motion picture and television productions, and the quality of the jobs they provide, in California.

(B) To keep California’s Film Tax Credit competitive with production incentives offered by other states and other countries.

(C) To increase the competitiveness of the tax credits allowed by this section and Section 23698.1 relative to previous California motion picture tax credit programs authorized by Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, and 23698 by allowing the tax credit to be refundable.

(2) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the credits accomplish the specific goals, purposes, and objectives may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The
 number and types of productions that apply for the tax credits allowed by this section and Section 23698.1.

(B) The total amount of credit allocations applied for under this section and Section 23698.1.

(C) The total amount of credits allocated under this section and Section 23698.1.

(D) The total amount of credits certified as eligible to be claimed on a tax return under this section and Section 23698.1.

(E) The number of jobs included in the budgets of productions receiving the tax credits allocated by this section and Section 23698.1.

(F) The number of productions relocating from another state or country to California and receive the tax credits allocated by this section and Section
 23698.1.

(G) A comparison of the performance indicators specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, with results from California motion picture tax credit programs authorized by Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, and 23698.

(H) The total amount of credits allocated by this section and Section 23698.1 that are claimed as a refund on a tax return.

(3) On or before May 1, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall provide to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, and the public a report evaluating the effectiveness of the tax credits allowed by this section and Section 23698.1 in achieving the metrics outlined in subdivision (a), including an assessment of the refundability of the tax credit in achieving those metrics. In researching the
 reports, the Legislative Analyst’s Office may do all of the following:

(A) Request and receive all information of California Film Commission applicants for which a credit allocation decision has been made, including, but not limited to, applicants that did not receive a credit allocation, provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section and Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, 23698, and 23698.1.

(B) Request and receive all information provided to the Franchise Tax Board relating to the sale or assignment of credits pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section and Sections 17053.95, 17053.98, 23695, 23698, and 23698.1.

(C) Request and receive all information provided to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section
 6902.5.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the California Film Commission, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, the Franchise Tax Board, the Employment Development Department, and all other relevant state agencies shall provide additional information, as requested by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, as necessary to research the report required by this subdivision.

(5) (A) The information received by the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section shall be considered confidential taxpayer information subject to Sections 7056, 7056.5, and 19542 of this code and Section 1094 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and shall be subject to the appropriate confidentiality requirements of the participating state agency.

(B) The Legislative Analyst’s Office may publish
 statistics in conjunction with the reports required by this section that are derived from information provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office pursuant to this section, if the published statistics are classified to prevent the identification of particular taxpayers, reports, and tax returns and the publication of the percentage of dividends paid by a corporation that is deductible by the recipient under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 5.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.98.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17053.98, a qualified motion picture filmed on a soundstage that is, or is part of, a certified studio construction project, leased by a qualified taxpayer on or before September 1, 2026, for the purposes of filming a qualified motion picture, that subsequently became unavailable for filming because that soundstage was the subject of a qualified sublease, is deemed to be filmed at a certified studio construction project for any season the production period overlaps in whole or in part with the term of the qualified sublease if the filming occurs at a qualified alternative soundstage.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Certified studio construction project” has the same meaning as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.

(2) “Qualified alternative soundstage” means any soundstage or soundstages in California utilized by a production during the term of a qualified sublease.

(3) “Qualified sublease” means a sublease of a soundstage that is, or is part of, a certified studio construction project to any organization directly associated with, as determined by the California Film Commission, the Los Angeles 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, including, but not limited to, LA28, the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee, and the International Olympic Committee.

(c) A qualified taxpayer or applicant shall submit evidence of
 a qualified sublease to the California Film Commission. The California Film Commission has sole discretion to determine that a qualified motion picture is considered filmed at a certified studio construction project, for purposes of this section, for any season the production period overlaps in whole or in part with the term of the qualified sublease.

(d) A television series that films subsequent seasons at the qualified alternative soundstage after the term of the qualified sublease shall continue to be deemed to be produced at a certified studio construction project pursuant to this section. However, during the period after the term of the qualified sublease, if the qualified taxpayer or applicant for that television series earns tax credits pursuant to this section for production of the television series produced at the qualified alternative soundstage, then the equivalent number of soundstages at the previously unavailable certified studio
 construction project may not be treated as part of a certified studio construction project until the television series that films subsequent seasons at the qualified alternative soundstage ceases to claim the benefit of being produced at a qualified alternative soundstage project.

(e) Any soundstages that are, or are part of, a certified studio construction project shall receive an extension of certification equal to the amount of time of the qualified sublease, beyond the five-year certification in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.

(f) A qualified taxpayer or applicant filming on a qualified alternative soundstage, for purposes of this section, shall comply with all of the requirements of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 on the qualified alternative soundstage instead of on a certified studio construction project, as defined in
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 10.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.99.

A taxpayer seeking certification of a certified studio construction project by the California Film Commission shall do both of the following:

(a) Certify to the California Film Commission that either of the following is true:

(1) The entirety of the project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(2) The project is not in its entirety a public work for which prevailing wages must be paid under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, but all
 construction workers employed on the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the project is subject to this paragraph, then for those portions of the project that are not a public work all of the following shall apply:

(A) The taxpayer shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of all construction work.

(B) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction
 workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided therein.

(D) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to
 Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(E) Subparagraphs (C) and (D) shall not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed
 in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Certify to the California Film Commission that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the proposed project.

(1) For purposes of this section, “skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(2) If the taxpayer has certified that a skilled and trained workforce
 will be used to construct all work on the project, the following shall apply:

(A) The taxpayer shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the project.

(B) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the project.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “taxpayer” has the same meaning as “awarding body” as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(D) Contractors and subcontractors that fail to use a skilled and trained
 workforce shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties for a contractor’s or subcontractor’s failure to comply with the requirement to use a skilled and trained workforce may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(E) The taxpayer shall provide copies of the monthly reports demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to the California Film Commission on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed. These reports shall be a public record under
 the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection.

(F) Subparagraphs (C) to (E), inclusive, shall not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 145.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17054.

In the case of individuals, the following credits for personal exemption may be deducted from the tax imposed under Section 17041 or 17048, less any increases imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), or both, of Section 17560.

(a) In the case of a single individual, a head of household, or a spouse making a separate return, a credit of fifty-two dollars ($52).

(b) In the case of a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046), or spouses making a joint return, a credit of one hundred four dollars ($104). If one spouse was a resident for the entire taxable year and the other spouse was a nonresident for all or any portion of the taxable year, the personal exemption shall be divided
 equally.

(c) In addition to any other credit provided in this section, in the case of an individual who is 65 years of age or over by the end of the taxable year, a credit of fifty-two dollars ($52).

(d) (1) A credit of two hundred twenty-seven dollars ($227) for each dependent (as defined in Section 17056) for whom an exemption is allowable under Section 151(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to additional exemption for dependents. The credit allowed under this subdivision for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1999, shall not be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (i) for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2000.

(2) (A) (i) For
 taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015,
 and before January 1, 2018, a credit shall not be allowed under paragraph (1) with respect to any individual unless the identification number, as defined in Section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code, of that individual is included on the return claiming the credit.

(ii) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, a credit shall not be allowed under paragraph (1) with respect to any individual unless either of the following occurs:

(I) The identifying number, as defined in Section 6109 of the Internal Revenue Code, of that individual is included on the return claiming the credit.

(II) In the event an individual who is included on the return claiming the credit is ineligible for an identification number required in subclause (I), the taxpayer shall provide information to identify the
 individual in the form and the manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) A disallowance of a credit due to the omission of a correct identification number required under this paragraph, may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as is provided by Section 19051 in the case of a mathematical error appearing on the return. A claimant shall have the right to claim a credit or refund of adjusted amounts within the period provided in Section 19306, 19307, 19308, or 19311, whichever period expires later.

(3) (A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, the credit allowed under paragraph (1) for each dependent shall be equal to the credit allowed under subdivision (a). This subparagraph shall cease to be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, unless the Director of
 Finance makes the notification pursuant to Section 99040 of the Government Code, in which case this subparagraph shall cease to be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013.

(B) For taxable years that subparagraph (A) ceases to be operative, the credit allowed under paragraph (1) for each dependent shall be equal to the amount that would be allowed if subparagraph (A) had never been operative.

(e) A credit for personal exemption of fifty-two dollars ($52) for the taxpayer if the taxpayer is blind at the end of
 the taxpayer’s taxable year.

(f) A credit for personal exemption of fifty-two dollars ($52) for the spouse of the taxpayer if a separate return is made by the taxpayer, and if the spouse is blind and, for the calendar year in which the taxable year of the taxpayer begins, has no gross income and is not the dependent of another taxpayer.

(g) For the purposes of this section, an individual is blind only if either (1) the individual’s central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses, or (2)
 the individual’s visual acuity is greater than 20/200 but is accompanied by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees.

(h) In the case of an individual with respect to whom a credit under this section is allowable to another taxpayer for a taxable year beginning in the calendar year in which the individual’s taxable year begins, the credit amount applicable to that individual for that individual’s taxable year is zero.

(i) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1989, the Franchise Tax Board shall compute the credits prescribed in this section. That computation shall be made as follows:

(1) The Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the
 percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure which is furnished to them pursuant to paragraph (1), and divide the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the immediately preceding taxable year credits by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting products to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(4) In computing the credits pursuant to this subdivision, the credit provided in subdivision (b) shall be twice the credit provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   (AB 2247)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17054.1.

(a) (1) In the case of any taxpayer whose federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds the threshold amount, each credit to which this section applies shall be reduced by six dollars ($6) for each two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income exceeds the threshold amount. 

(2) In the case of credit allowed by subdivision (b) of Section 17054 (relating to joint returns and surviving
 spouses), the “six dollars ($6)” referred to in paragraph (1) shall be applied by substituting “twelve dollars ($12).” 

(3) In the case of a married individual filing a separate return, the “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)” referred to in paragraph (1) shall be applied by substituting “one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250).” 

(4) Under no circumstances shall any credit reduced by paragraph (1) be reduced below zero. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “threshold amount” means the following: 

(1) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in the case of a joint return or a surviving spouse, as defined by Section 17046. 

(2) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in
 the case of a head of a household, as defined by Section 17042. 

(3) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the case of an individual who is not married and who is not a surviving spouse or head of a household. 

(4) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the case of a married individual filing a separate return. 

(c) This section shall apply to the following credits: 

(1) Each of the credits allowed by Section 17054. 

(2) The credit allowed by Section 17054.6. 

(d) In the case of a taxpayer filing a nonresident or part-year resident return, the reduction of exemption credits, as provided by this section, shall be
 applicable prior to proration of those credits as provided by Section 17055. 

(e) For purposes of this section, marital status shall be determined under Section 17021.5.

(f) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1992, the threshold amounts specified in subdivision (b) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041. 

(g) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 474, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

17054.5.

(a) (1) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” (as defined in Section 17039) of a qualified individual an amount equal to 30 percent of the net tax. 

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 1988, a qualified individual means a qualified joint custody head of household as defined in subdivision (c). 

(3) For taxable years
 beginning on or after January 1, 1988, a qualified individual means either of the following:

(A) A “qualified joint custody head of household” as defined in subdivision (c). 

(B) A “qualified taxpayer” as defined in subdivision (e). 
